Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205A.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Established precincts. School district elections must be conducted in the precincts, or when the school district boundary divides a precinct, parts of precincts that have been established by the county or municipal governing bodies as provided in section 204B.14. If an election other than the school district election is being held in any part of a precinct, all the voters of the precinct must vote at the polling place designated for the precinct as provided in section 204B.14.new text begin At a special election conducted by a school district with boundaries that include more than one county, at least one polling place must be designated within each county in which more than 5,000 of the school district's registered voters reside, calculated as of the district's most recent general election.new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205A.11, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Notice of special elections. The school district clerk shall prepare a notice to the voters who will be voting in a combined polling place for a school district special election. The notice must include the following information: the date of the election, the hours of voting, and the location of the voter's polling placenew text begin , along with the cost of conducting the special election and the amount saved as a result of the school district conducting the election using combined polling placesnew text end . The notice must be sent by nonforwardable mail to every affected household in the school district with at least one registered voter. The notice must be mailed no later than 14 days before the election. The mailed notice is not required for a school district special election that is held on the second Tuesday in August, the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, or for a special election conducted entirely by mail. A notice that is returned as undeliverable must be forwarded immediately to the county auditor.new text begin The notice must also be posted on the school district's website.new text end